Alabama, session 2026rs, HB491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall only apply in Tallapoosa
County.
Section 2. (a) The Tallapoosa County Judge of Probate
may charge and collect an additional fee for the remote access
of records in the office of the judge of probate by computer
or other electronic or digital system.
(b) Fees collected pursuant to subsection (a) shall be
deposited into the special indexing fund of the Tallapoosa
County Judge of Probate or any successor special fund under
the control of the judge of probate. The funds shall be used
for the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the office,
including, but not limited to, the recording system and
remote-access services.
(c) The judge of probate shall have discretion to
determine the appropriate use of these funds for the general
operation, technology needs, or improvement of the office.
Section 3. The collection and expenditure of fees for
remote access of records in the office of the judge of probate
by computer or other electronic or digital system prior to the
effective date of this act are ratified and confirmed.
Section 4. This act shall become effective on June 1,
Page 1

Section 4. This act shall become effective on June 1,
HB491 Enrolled
2026.
Page 2

2026.
HB491 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 26-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 05-Mar-26 Passed



Page 3